South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1036.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 31, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-31-70.  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the renter may agree in the rental agreement that in the event of an automobile accident involving a rental vehicle provided by a rental company the renter's automobile liability insurance company will pay up to its limits of liability before the rental company must pay in accordance with Section 38-77-140. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----